Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [103I.2091] SUBMERGED CLOSED LOOP HEAT EXCHANGER SYSTEM; VARIANCES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Variance. new text end new text begin In addition to any variances considered under Minnesota Rules, part 4725.0410, to the isolation distance requirements under Minnesota Rules, part 4725.4450, for a water supply well containing a submerged closed loop heat exchange, the commissioner shall consider request for a variance for a water supply well containing a submerged closed loop heat exchanger for the sole purpose of heating and cooling if the applicant demonstrates that strict compliance with the isolation distance requirement would impose an undue burden on the applicant's ability to design and install an effective submerged closed loop heat exchanger system. In evaluating variance requests, the commissioner shall consider factors critical to the effective design and operation of the submerged closed loop heat exchanger system, including but not limited to the need for adequate spacing between submerged closed loop heat exchanger wells to optimize thermal performance and the necessity of minimizing lateral piping lengths to reduce energy loss and improve system efficiency. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin In Minnesota Statutes the revisor of statutes shall renumber section 103I.208, subdivision 3, as section 103I.2091, subdivision 2, and shall appropriately revise any statutory cross-references consistent with that recoding. new text end